Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.380

Leave sharing program.

Every school district board of directors and educational service district superintendent may, in accordance with RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.665, establish and administer a leave sharing program for their certificated and classified employees. For employees of school districts and educational service districts, the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt standards: (1) Establishing appropriate parameters for the program which are consistent with the provisions of RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.665; and (2) establishing procedures to ensure that the program does not significantly increase the cost of providing leave.

[ 1997 c 13 s 12; 1990 c 23 s 4; 1989 c 93 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.58.0991.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 93: See note following RCW 41.04.650.